Hawaii statutes.
§383-29.7 Partial unemployment; claim filing
requirements, determinations. (a) Claims for partial unemployment shall
be filed according to section 383-32. For partially unemployed individuals, a
new claim may be taken within twenty-eight days from the week-ending date of
the first week of partial unemployment for which the claim is filed; provided
that an individual shall not be required to file a claim earlier than two weeks
from the date wages are paid for the claim period.

(b) An individual may file a continued claim
certification for partial unemployment benefits in person, by mail, by
telephone, or by using other alternative claim filing procedures as instructed
or authorized by the department and in the manner prescribed by the department
with respect to each week of the individual's partial unemployment. A continued claim certification shall be filed
in the same manner as prescribed in rules of the department for continued claim
certifications for total or part-total unemployment benefits and not later than
twenty-eight days from the end of the week for which the individual claims
benefits; provided that an individual shall not be required to file a continued
claim certification earlier than two weeks from the date wages are paid for a
claim period. [L 2009, c 170, pt of §2, §7; am L 2010, c 76, §3; am L 2011, c
165, §§3, 5]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next